Utah statutes.
57-14-6.   Liability not limited where willful or malicious conduct involved or admission fee charged.

(1)  Nothing in this chapter shall limit any liability which otherwise exists for:

(a)  willful or malicious failure to guard or warn against a dangerous condition, use, structure, or activity;

(b)  deliberate, willful, or malicious injury to persons or property; or

(c)  an injury suffered where the owner of land charges a person to enter or go on the land or use the land for any recreational purpose.

(2)  For purposes of Subsection (1)(c), if the land is leased to the state or a subdivision of the state, any consideration received by the owner for the lease is not a charge within the meaning of this section.

(3)  Any person who hunts upon a cooperative wildlife management unit, as authorized by Title 23, Chapter 23, Cooperative Wildlife Management Units, is not considered to have paid a fee within the meaning of this section.

(4)  Owners of a dam or reservoir who allow recreational use of the dam or reservoir and its surrounding area and do not themselves charge a fee for that use, are considered not to have charged for that use within the meaning of Subsection (1)(c), even if the user pays a fee to the Division of Parks and Recreation for the use of the services and facilities at that dam or reservoir.

(5)  The state or a subdivision of the state that owns property purchased for a railway corridor is considered not to have charged for use of the railway corridor within the meaning of Subsection (1)(c), even if the user pays a fee for travel on a privately owned rail car that crosses or travels over the railway corridor if the state or a subdivision of the state:

(a)  allows recreational use of the railway corridor and its surrounding area; and

(b)  does not charge a fee for that use.

